Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [342.125] FAIR LENDING REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Borrower" means a person who is a prospective license holder, an applicant for a license, or a current license holder under this chapter. new text end new text begin (c) "Lender" means an individual or entity that offers or makes a secured or unsecured loan or other extension of credit to a borrower. Lender does not include a bank, credit union, or any other lender that is under the supervision of or regulated by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Administration, or the Department of Commerce. new text end new text begin (d) "Loan" means a loan offered or made by a lender to a borrower to obtain a license under section 342.10 or to obtain real estate, operational funding, equipment, or other business necessities to start or operate a cannabis business. For purposes of this section, a loan does not include amounts under $10,000. new text end new text begin (e) "Loan contract" means the loan agreement between a lender and a borrower. new text end new text begin (f) "Person" means: new text end new text begin (1) a natural person; new text end new text begin (2) a partnership, as defined in section 323A.0101, clause (8); new text end new text begin (3) a limited partnership, as defined in section 321.0102, clause (11); new text end new text begin (4) a limited liability partnership, as defined in section 321.0102, clause (9); new text end new text begin (5) a limited liability company, as defined in section 322C.0102, subdivision 12; new text end new text begin (6) a cooperative, as defined in section 308A.005, subdivision 5, or 308B.005, subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (7) a public benefit corporation, as defined in section 304A.021, subdivision 7; new text end new text begin (8) a nonprofit corporation organized under chapter 317A; or new text end new text begin (9) a privately held company or corporation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Fair lending requirement. new text end new text begin A lender is prohibited from making a loan to a borrower unless the loan complies with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Fair lending disclosures; notice; contents. new text end new text begin (a) No less than five days before a loan contract is executed, a lender must deliver to the borrower an itemized list of disclosures. The list must be provided in writing and must clearly and conspicuously identify: new text end new text begin (1) the loan's interest rate, expressed as an annual percentage; new text end new text begin (2) the finance charges; new text end new text begin (3) the payment schedule; new text end new text begin (4) the total amount financed; new text end new text begin (5) the dates and amounts of a balloon payment, if any; and new text end new text begin (6) the total payment amount over the life of the loan. new text end new text begin (b) A lender must provide notice of default and a reasonable opportunity to cure before exercising an enforcement right granted under a loan contract. new text end new text begin (c) The loan contract and all disclosures must be written in the language used to negotiate the transaction. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin False advertisements or solicitations prohibited. new text end new text begin A lender or a person soliciting loans on a lender's behalf is prohibited from soliciting a borrower for a loan through an advertisement, print, display, publication, correspondence, electronic means, or other manner that is false, misleading, or deceptive with respect to the rates, terms, or conditions for a loan, credit, goods, or things in action. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin A loan made by a lender in violation of this section is void and the borrower is not obligated to pay any amounts owed on the loan. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to loans offered or made on or after that date. new text end